Massachusetts, session 194th, S520.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. The Massachusetts General Laws are hereby amended by inserting the 
following new chapter: 
Election Integrity Qualifications Improvement Act 
PURPOSE – It being within the competence, and purposes of The Constitution of 
Massachusetts, and the laws of The Commonwealth, to accomplish many suitable legal purposes, 
including the process, and decision making of elections, in such manner, as to provide integrity, 
transparency, and the following of appropriate qualifications, for the various, and several offices, 
that may be placed on the ballot, this legislation is established to improve such standards.  

of 3 9  While members of political parties, are nominally members, by choice, of quasi-private 
organizations; insofar as they directly, and indirectly, participate in the process of public, and 
democratic choice, in our republican system of government, they are performing specific 
purposes of public law, and purpose.  
Further, in the performance of their activities, some such individuals, often participate 
formally, and/or informally, in the selection of specific public officials, who are compensated as 
public employees, to conduct the honest, and efficient performance of elections.  
SECTION 2. Therefore, it is in the public interest, for such individuals, to have improved 
qualifications, that will further improve the commitment of political, and electoral officials, and 
the confidence of voters, and the effectiveness of those operations. 
All such persons, as are elected to be members of Massachusetts political party State 
Committees, and/or members of city ward committees, city committees, and town committees, 
shall be sworn, or affirmed, into their political party offices, by conventional legal oath, or 
affirmation, as to their solemn acceptance of following the Constitution, and Laws, faithfully; 
including respect, following, and carrying out of all electoral laws, and regulations.  
Such individuals, shall have the Oath, or Affirmation Of Office, delivered, at their 
Organizing Meeting, after their election, having been on a public ballot; by the appropriate local 
official, be they the City Clerk, the Town Clerk, or by another designated official, clearly 
responsible to such Clerks, such as the Chair of an Election Commission, or Board of Registrars 
of Voters. 

of 3 29  The City Chair, or Town Chair, of a political party, once sworn in, or affirmed, shall be 
authorized to provide such Oath, or Affirmation, to those individuals subsequently appointed, 
elected, or otherwise designated, to fill legal vacancies. 
A written record, including the signature of those persons taking such Oath, or 
Affirmation, and the individual administering the oath, shall be established, in a conventional 
process, as further defined, by appropriate regulations, authorized by the Secretary of State of 
The Commonwealth of Massachusetts, and shall, in fact, accompany conventional records of 
Organizing Meetings, and names of official members of such political organizations.